Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8470.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 45-53 of the General Laws entitled "Low and Moderate Income
Housing" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
45-53-17. Affordable housing stock in Coventry.
The Rhode Island housing authority shall verify and document the count of affordable
housing stock in the town of Coventry two (2) times per year.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006312
========